Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 1. Oil and Gas Production Tax.
Sec. 43.55.028.
Oil and gas tax credit fund established; cash purchases of tax credit certificates.

The oil and gas tax credit fund is established as a separate fund of the state. The purpose of the fund is to purchase transferable tax credit certificates issued under AS

43.55.023

and production tax credit certificates issued under AS

43.55.025

and to pay refunds and payments claimed under AS

43.20.046

,

43.20.047

, or

43.20.053

. The oil and gas tax credit fund established under this subsection may not be used to purchase a tax credit certificate for a credit earned under this chapter for activity occurring on or after July 1, 2017.

The oil and gas tax credit fund consists of

money appropriated to the fund, including any appropriation of the percentage provided under (c) of this section of all revenue from taxes levied by AS

43.55.011

that is not required to be deposited in the constitutional budget reserve fund established in art. IX, sec. 17(a), Constitution of the State of Alaska, less the amount described in (r) of this section; and

earnings on the fund.

The applicable percentage for a fiscal year under (b)(1) of this section is determined with reference to the average price or value forecast by the department for Alaska North Slope oil sold or otherwise disposed of on the United States West Coast during the fiscal year for which the appropriation of revenue from taxes levied by AS

43.55.011

is made. If that forecast is

$60 a barrel or higher, the applicable percentage is 10 percent;

less than $60 a barrel, the applicable percentage is 15 percent.

The department shall manage the fund.

The department, on the written application of a person to whom a transferable tax credit certificate has been issued under AS

43.55.023(d)

or former AS

43.55.023(m)

for an expenditure incurred before July 1, 2017, or to whom a production tax credit certificate has been issued under AS

43.55.025(f)

for an expenditure incurred before July 1, 2017, may use either available money in the oil and gas tax credit fund or, subject to appropriation by the legislature, money disbursed to the commissioner, or both, to purchase, in whole or in part, the certificate. The department may not purchase with money from the oil and gas tax credit fund a total of more than $70,000,000 in tax credit certificates from a person in a calendar year. The total amount of purchases made by the department with money from the oil and gas tax credit fund from a person in a year may not exceed the assumed payment amount for each year, as calculated under (l) of this section without the discount provided in (m) of this section. Before purchasing a certificate or part of a certificate, the department shall find that

the calendar year of the purchase is not earlier than the first calendar year for which the credit shown on the certificate would otherwise be allowed to be applied against a tax;

the application is not the result of the division of a single entity into multiple entities that would reasonably be expected to apply as a single entity if the $70,000,000 limitation in this subsection did not exist;

the applicant’s total tax liability under AS

43.55.011(e)

, after application of all available tax credits, for the calendar year in which the application is made is zero;

the applicant’s average daily production of oil and gas taxable under AS

43.55.011(e)

during the calendar year preceding the calendar year in which the application is made was not more than 50,000 BTU equivalent barrels; and

the purchase is consistent with this section and regulations adopted under this section.

Money in the fund remaining at the end of a fiscal year does not lapse and remains available for expenditure in successive fiscal years.

The department shall adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this section, including standards and procedures to allocate available money among applications for purchases under this chapter and claims for refunds and payments under AS

43.20.046

,

43.20.047

, or

43.20.053

when the total amount of the applications for purchase and claims for refund exceed the amount of available money in the fund. The regulations adopted by the department

may not, when allocating available money in the fund under this section, distinguish an application for the purchase of a credit certificate issued under former AS

43.55.023(m)

or a claim for a refund or payment under AS

43.20.046

,

43.20.047

, or

43.20.053

;

must, when allocating available money in the fund under this section, grant a preference, between two applicants, to the applicant with a higher percentage of resident workers in the applicant’s workforce, including workers employed by the applicant’s direct contractors, in the state in the previous calendar year; in this paragraph, “resident worker” has the meaning given in AS

43.40.092(b)

;

must, for a purchase from money in the fund, provide for the purchase of the amount equal to the first 50 percent of the credit repurchase limit for each person under (e) of this section at a rate of 100 percent of the value of the certificate or portion of the certificate requested to be purchased and the amount equal to the next 50 percent of the credit repurchase limit for each person under (e) of this section at a rate of 75 percent of the value of the certificate or portion of the certificate requested to be purchased.

Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

In this section,

“money disbursed to the commissioner” means money disbursed to the commissioner from the Alaska Tax Credit Certificate Bond Corporation reserve fund established in AS

37.18.040

;

“qualified capital expenditure” has the meaning given in AS

43.55.023

;

“true interest cost” means the true interest cost of the bonds anticipated to be issued under AS 37.18.

If an applicant or claimant has an outstanding liability to the state directly related to the applicant’s or claimant’s oil or gas exploration, development, or production and the department has not previously reduced the amount paid to that applicant or claimant for a certificate or refund because of that outstanding liability, the department may purchase only that portion of a certificate or pay only that portion of a refund that exceeds the outstanding liability, regardless of whether the purchase is made with money from the fund or money disbursed to the commissioner. After notifying the applicant or claimant, the department may apply the amount by which the department reduced its purchase of a certificate or payment for a refund because of an outstanding liability to satisfy the outstanding liability. Satisfaction of an outstanding liability under this subsection does not affect the applicant’s ability to contest that liability. The department may enter into contracts or agreements with another department to which the outstanding liability is owed. In this subsection, “outstanding liability” means an amount of tax, interest, penalty, fee, rental, royalty, or other charge for which the state has issued a demand for payment that has not been paid when due and, if contested, has not been finally resolved against the state.

The department may negotiate a purchase, refund, or payment under this section to be made from money disbursed to the commissioner. Before making a purchase, refund, or payment, the department shall calculate the maximum amount for a purchase, refund, or payment under ( l) of this section. An applicant or claimant that has requested a purchase, refund, or payment by the department from the fund shall provide a notice of interest to the department by the date determined by the commissioner if the applicant or claimant is interested in a purchase, refund, or payment from money disbursed to the commissioner instead. An applicant or claimant that requests a purchase, refund, or payment from the fund on or after July 1, 2018, shall include any notice of interest in a purchase, refund, or payment from money disbursed to the commissioner at the same time that the applicant or claimant requests a purchase, refund, or payment by the department from the fund. The department may not use money disbursed to the commissioner for a purchase, refund, or payment under this section if the applicant or claimant fails to provide the department with a notice of interest in a purchase, refund, or payment from money disbursed to the commissioner. A notice of interest for a purchase, refund, or payment from money disbursed to the commissioner must include all of the requests for purchases, refunds, or payments made by the applicant or claimant and, if applicable, a statement indicating whether the applicant intends to meet a condition in (m)(1), (2), or (3) of this section. An applicant or claimant may not include in a notice of interest a request for purchase, refund, or payment from the fund if the request could have been included in a previous notice of interest under this subsection. The department shall make an offer of purchase, refund, or payment with money disbursed to the commissioner to an applicant or claimant that provides the department with a timely notice of interest. The department shall make an offer of purchase, refund, or payment from money disbursed to the commissioner at a time based on the anticipated schedule for disbursement of money to the commissioner. The applicant or claimant shall notify the department of acceptance of the offer of purchase, refund, or payment within 10 days after the offer is made. An offer of purchase, refund, or payment must be conditioned on the disbursement of money to the commissioner. A transferable tax credit certificate issued under AS

43.55.023

, production tax credit certificate issued under AS

43.55.025

, or claim for a refund or payment under AS

43.20.046

,

43.20.047

, or

43.20.053

is not eligible for purchase by the department with money disbursed to the commissioner if the applicant or claimant

fails to provide the department with a notice of interest of an offer of purchase, refund, or payment from money disbursed to the commissioner by the date determined by the commissioner under this subsection; or

declines an offer of purchase, refund, or payment by the department with money disbursed to the commissioner for that transferable tax credit certificate, production tax credit certificate, or refund or claim for payment.

The department shall calculate the maximum amount for a purchase, refund, or payment with money disbursed to the commissioner. The maximum amount for a purchase, refund, or payment is the sum of the assumed payment amounts for purchases, refunds, and payments for each year discounted as provided in (m) of this section. The assumed payment amount for each year is the assumed appropriations to the fund multiplied by the assumed proration amount calculated in this subsection. The assumed appropriation to the fund each year is an amount equal to the percentage provided under (c) of this section of the total taxes levied by AS

43.55.011

as forecast by the department before the application of tax credits. The assumed proration amount is that proportion of payments the department would have allocated from the fund, if money had not been disbursed to the commissioner, based on the date of the request for purchase, refund, or payment from the fund. When determining the assumed proration amount under this subsection, the department shall

allocate requests received in the same year together;

prioritize requests for payments from the earliest to the latest year; and

assume that no purchases are made with money disbursed to the commissioner.

For purposes of the calculation in ( l) of this section, the department shall discount the assumed payment amount each year after the first year by a discount rate. Unless another discount rate in this subsection applies, a discount rate of 10 percent applies to the assumed payment amount for a request for purchase of a transferable tax credit certificate issued under AS

43.55.023

or a production tax credit certificate issued under AS

43.55.025

. An applicant’s agreement to a discount rate under (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection is only consideration for the amount that the purchase exceeds the amount that would have been purchased in the absence of the agreement. For a refund or claim for payment under AS

43.20.046

,

43.20.047

, or

43.20.053

, the discount rate is the true interest cost plus 1.5 percent, but may not exceed 10 percent. For a purchase of a transferable tax credit certificate issued under AS

43.55.023

or a production tax credit certificate issued under AS

43.55.025

, the discount rate is the true interest cost plus 1.5 percent, but may not exceed 10 percent, in total,

for either a transferable tax credit certificate issued under AS 43.55.023 for which the applicant submitted data required under AS

43.55.025(f)(2)

or a production tax credit certificate issued under AS 43.55.025, if the applicant agrees as a condition of the purchase that the 10-year confidentiality period under AS

43.55.025(f)(2)(C)(ii)

that would otherwise apply to the seismic data or other geophysical data is waived by the applicant;

if the applicant, or an entity related to the applicant with the applicant’s consent, and the Department of Natural Resources agree to an overriding royalty interest agreement under AS

44.37.230

; or

if the applicant commits to incur, not later than 24 months after the purchase of the certificate, qualified capital expenditures in an amount greater than or equal to the purchase amount, and

the applicant provides to the department evidence of the commitment and a plan to

use the qualified capital expenditures for the purpose of increasing production of oil or gas from leases or properties in the state; and

maximize the hiring of state residents and use of state businesses related to qualified capital expenditures;

the applicant agrees in writing that, if the applicant does not incur qualified capital expenditures in an amount greater than or equal to the purchase amount within 24 months after the purchase of the certificate, the applicant shall pay the department the lesser of the difference between the purchase amount and the

amount the applicant would have been paid had this subsection not applied; or

actual amount of qualified capital expenditures incurred by the applicant in the 24-month period; and

after reviewing documents submitted under (A) and (B) of this paragraph, the commissioner approves the reduced discount rate for the purchase.

An agreement under (m)(3)(B) of this section may require the applicant to pay the department interest on the amount due under (m)(3)(B) of this section. The interest rate must be consistent with the interest rate provided for a delinquent tax under AS

43.05.225

. Payment under (m)(3)(B) of this section and interest under this subsection is waived if the department determines that the applicant could not incur the qualified capital expenditures because of a natural disaster, injunction or other court order, or administrative order.

An applicant or claimant may not use a transferable tax credit certificate issued under AS

43.55.023

, production tax credit certificate issued under AS

43.55.025

, or refund or claim for payment under AS

43.20.046

,

43.20.047

, or

43.20.053

purchased by the department with money disbursed to the commissioner against tax liability, even if the purchase, refund, or payment amount was less than the total amount requested for purchase, refund, or payment.

The department shall provide to the Department of Natural Resources the information necessary to evaluate an overriding royalty interest for the purposes of AS

44.37.230

.

After bonds are first issued by the Alaska Tax Credit Certificate Bond Corporation established under AS

37.18.010

, the legislature may determine the amount of an appropriation under (b)(1) of this section by multiplying the percentage under (c) of this section by the net revenue from taxes levied by AS

43.55.011

.

The legislature may reduce an appropriation made under (b)(1) of this section by an amount equal to the amount appropriated to the Alaska Tax Credit Certificate Bond Corporation for maintenance of the required debt service reserve in the Alaska Tax Credit Certificate Bond Corporation reserve fund, as calculated under AS

37.18.040(g)

.

The legislature may, for purposes of making purchases, refunds, and payments under this section, appropriate an amount equal to the amount disbursed to the commissioner by the Alaska Tax Credit Certificate Bond Corporation for purchases, refunds, and payments under this section.

History.

(§ 46 ch 1 SSSLA 2007; am § 12 ch 15 SLA 2010; am §§ 18 — 20 ch 16 SLA 2010; am §§ 16, 17 ch 51 SLA 2012; am §§ 25, 26 ch 10 SLA 2013; am §§ 4, 5 ch 108 SLA 2014; am §§ 23 — 25 ch 4 4SSLA 2016; am §§ 20, 21 ch 3 SSSLA 2017; am §§ 6 — 11 ch 33 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

The amendments to (e) of this section made by § 12, ch. 15, SLA 2010, and § 19, ch. 16, SLA 2010, were harmonized by the revisor.
In the 2010 amendments to (e) and (g) of this section, internal references to “AS

43.55.023(n)

” were changed to “AS

43.55.023(m)

” to conform to the relettering of that subsection.

In 2012, the paragraphs in subsection (e) were renumbered to reflect the 2010 repeal of former paragraphs (2) and (3).

Cross references. —

For transition provision relating to a transferable tax credit certificate for a carried-forward annual loss earned under former AS

43.55.023(b)

in calendar year 2017 and providing limitations on the Department of Revenue’s repurchase of a transferable tax credit certificate issued of a carried-forward annual loss earned during calendar year 2017, see sec. 38, ch. 3, SSSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts

For provision relating to the retroactivity of regulations for this section, see sec. 15, ch. 33, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (e), in the introductory language, added the second sentence, and substituted “Before purchasing a certificate or part of a certificate, the department shall find that” for “If the department finds that” at the end of the introductory language, in (e)(2), substituted “application is not the result of the division of a single entity into multiple entities that would reasonably be expected to apply as a single entity if the $70,000,000 limitation in this subsection did not exist” for “applicant does not have an outstanding liability to the state for unpaid delinquent taxes under this title”; in (g), substituted “shall adopt” for “may adopt”; designated a portion of (g) as (g)(1); added (g)(2) and (3); added (j); made related and stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, added the last sentence in (a), in the introductory language in (e), twice inserted “for an expenditure incurred before July 1, 2017”.

The 2018 amendment, effective June 21, 2018, in (b)(1), inserted “, less the amount described in (r) of this section” near the end; in the introductory language in (e), in the first sentence, inserted “either” preceding “available money”, and “or, subject to appropriation by the legislature, money disbursed to the commissioner, or both,” following “gas tax credit fund”, in the second sentence, inserted “with money from the oil and gas tax credit fund” following “may not purchase”, added the third sentence; in (g)(3),
inserted “, for a purchase from money in the fund,” following “must” at the beginning; in (i), added (i)(1) and (3), and made related changes; in (j), added “, regardless of whether the purchase is made with money from the fund or money disbursed to the commissioner” at the end of the first sentence; added (k) – (s).

Editor’s notes. —

Sec. 38, ch. 10, SLA 2013 provides that the 2013 amendment of (e) of this section is retroactive to January 1, 2013.

Under sec. 35(a),
ch. 4, 4SSLA 2016, the 2016 amendments to subsections (e) and (j) and “regulations related to a tax credit certificate purchase preference” adopted under subsection (g) “apply to a purchase applied for on or after January 1, 2017.”

Under sec. 42,
ch. 3, SSSLA 2017, the 2017 amendments to (a) and (e) of this section are retroactive to July 1, 2017.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 1, SSSLA 2007 (HB 2001), presenting, among other matter, proposals relating to establishment of an oil and gas tax credit fund to implement purchase of authorized tax credits from explorers and producers, see 2007 House Journal 1547 — 1550.

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 33, SLA 2018 (HB 331), which amended this section, see 2018 House Journal 2341
— 2343.

Sec. 43.55.029.
Assignment of tax credit certificate.

An explorer or producer that has applied for a production tax credit under AS

43.55.023(a)

or (l) or

43.55.025(a)

may make a present assignment of the production tax credit certificate expected to be issued by the department to a third-party assignee. The assignment may be made either at the time the application is filed with the department or not later than 30 days after the date of filing with the department. Once a notice of assignment in compliance with this section is filed with the department, the assignment is irrevocable and cannot be modified by the explorer or producer without the written consent of the assignee named in the assignment. If a production tax credit certificate is issued to the explorer or producer, the notice of assignment remains effective and shall be filed with the department by the explorer or producer together with any application for the department to purchase the certificate under AS

43.55.028(e)

.

To be effective, the assignment does not require the approval or consent of the department. The assignment must, at a minimum,

be made in writing and signed by an officer or legally qualified agent of the explorer or producer making the assignment and the assignee, respectively;

identify the explorer or producer making the assignment, the assignee in whose favor the assignment is being made, and the production tax credit application that is the subject of the assignment;

define the interest in the production tax credit being assigned, expressed as either an amount in dollars, which may not exceed 90 percent of the credit applied for, or a percentage of the credit to be issued by the department;

specify an account with a bank located in the state, with sufficient information for the electronic transfer of funds, to receive any future proceeds from the purchase of the tax credit certificate under AS

43.55.028(e)

;

cite this section and acknowledge that, once filed with the department, the assignment is irrevocable and cannot be modified without the written consent of the assignee.

An assignment complying with this section creates a property interest owned by the assignee in the application and any production tax credit certificates issued by the department to the explorer or producer and any future proceeds resulting from the application, in the amount or to the extent set out in the assignment. An assignee may create a valid and enforceable security interest in that property as otherwise provided by law.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and to the maximum extent permitted under federal laws, an assignment complying with this section shall give the assignee a first priority claim, not dischargeable in bankruptcy, against the proceeds received by the explorer or producer, including its estate, trustee, or other representative, resulting from the production tax credit application that is the subject of the assignment under this section, if the assignee has taken the steps necessary under state and federal law to perfect a security interest in the assignment.

Nothing in this section affects the terms and conditions otherwise required for an explorer or producer to qualify for a production tax credit or the determination by the department of the amount of credit the explorer or producer is qualified to receive.

Neither the state nor the department, or any other agency, officer, or employee of the state, shall be subject to suit or any claim arising out of or in connection with an assignment made under this section, whether by act or omission.

The department may adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2013; am § 22 ch 3 SSSLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, in (a), substituted “AS

43.55.023(a)

or (

l

)” for “AS

43.55.023(a)

, (b), or (

l

)” in the first sentence.

Sec. 43.55.030.
Filing of statements.

A producer that produces oil or gas from a lease or property in the state during a calendar year, whether or not any tax payment is due under AS

43.55.020(a)

for that oil or gas, shall file with the department on March 31 of the following year a statement, under oath, in a form prescribed by the department, giving, with other information required, the following:

a description of each lease or property from which oil or gas was produced, by name, legal description, lease number, or accounting codes assigned by the department;

the names of the producer and, if different, the person paying the tax, if any;

the gross amount of oil and the gross amount of gas produced from each lease or property, separately identifying the gross amount of gas produced from each oil and gas lease to which an effective election under AS

43.55.014(a)

applies, the amount of gas delivered to the state under AS

43.55.014(b)

, and the percentage of the gross amount of oil and gas owned by the producer;

the gross value at the point of production of the oil and of the gas produced from each lease or property owned by the producer and the costs of transportation of the oil and gas;

the name of the first purchaser and the price received for the oil and for the gas, unless relieved from this requirement in whole or in part by the department;

the producer’s qualified capital expenditures, as defined in AS

43.55.023

, other lease expenditures under AS

43.55.165

, and adjustments or other payments or credits under AS

43.55.170

;

the production tax values of the oil and gas under AS

43.55.160(a)

or of the oil under AS

43.55.160(h)

, as applicable;

any claims for tax credits to be applied; and

calculations showing the amounts, if any, that were or are due under AS

43.55.020(a)

and interest on any underpayment or overpayment.

[Repealed, § 11 ch 101 SLA 1972.]

[Repealed, § 11 ch 101 SLA 1972.]

Reports required under this section are delinquent the first day following the day the report is due. The person required to file the report is liable for a penalty, as determined by the department under standards adopted in regulation by the department, of not more than $1,000 for each day the person fails to file the report at the time required. The penalty is in addition to the penalties in AS

43.05.220

and

43.05.290

and is assessed, collected, and paid in the same manner as a tax deficiency under this title. In this subsection, “report” includes a statement.

An explorer or producer that incurs a lease expenditure under AS

43.55.165

or receives a payment or credit under AS

43.55.170

during a calendar year but does not produce oil or gas from a lease or property in the state during the calendar year shall file with the department, on March 31 of the following year, a statement, under oath, in a form prescribed by the department, giving, with other information required, the following:

the explorer’s or producer’s qualified capital expenditures, as defined in AS

43.55.023

, other lease expenditures under AS

43.55.165

, and adjustments or other payments or credits under AS

43.55.170

; and

if the explorer or producer receives a payment or credit under AS 43.55.170, calculations showing whether the explorer or producer is liable for a tax under AS

43.55.160(d)

or

43.55.170(b)

and, if so, the amount.

The department may require a producer, an explorer, or an operator of a lease or property to file monthly reports, as applicable, of

the amounts and gross value at the point of production of oil and gas produced;

transportation costs of the oil and gas;

any unscheduled interruption of, or reduction in the rate of, oil or gas production;

lease expenditures and adjustments under AS

43.55.165

and

43.55.170

;

joint interest billings;

contracts for the sale or transportation of oil or gas;

information and calculations used in determining monthly installment payments of estimated tax under AS

43.55.020(a)

; and

other records and information the department considers necessary for the administration of this chapter.

History.

(§ 4 ch 7 ESLA 1955; am §§ 10 — 12 ch 101 SLA 1972; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 136 SLA 1977; am §§ 19, 20 ch 2 TSSLA 2006; am §§ 47 — 49 ch 1 SSSLA 2007; am § 27 ch 10 SLA 2013; am § 56 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 14, SLA 2014, see 2014 Senate Journal 1423 — 1426.

Administrative Code. —

For gross value at the point of production of oil and gas, see 15 AAC 55, art. 1.

For tax credits, see 15 AAC 55, art. 3.

For payments and reporting, see 15 AAC 55, art. 5.

Editor’s notes. —

Sections 35(a) and 39, ch. 2, TSSLA 2006, provide that the 2006 amendment of (a) and (d) of this section are retroactive to April 1, 2006, and “apply to oil and gas produced after March 31, 2006.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 1, SSSLA 2007 (HB 2001), presenting, among other matter, proposals to strengthen reporting requirements and impose additional penalties for failure to file reports when due, see 2007 House Journal 1547 — 1550.

Sec. 43.55.040.
Powers of Department of Revenue.

Except as provided in AS

43.05.405

—

43.05.499

, the department may

require a person engaged in production and the agent or employee of the person, and the purchaser of oil or gas, or the owner of a royalty interest in oil or gas to furnish, whether by the filing of regular statements or reports or otherwise, additional information that is considered by the department as necessary to compute the amount of the tax; notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, the disclosure of additional information under this paragraph to the producer obligated to pay the tax does not violate AS

40.25.100(a)

or AS

43.05.230(a)

; before disclosing information under this paragraph that is otherwise required to be held confidential under AS

40.25.100(a)

or AS

43.05.230(a)

, the department shall

provide the person that furnished the information a reasonable opportunity to be heard regarding the proposed disclosure and the conditions to be imposed under (B) of this paragraph; and

impose appropriate conditions limiting

access to the information to those legal counsel, consultants, employees, officers, and agents of the producer who have a need to know that information for the purpose of determining or contesting the producer’s tax obligation; and

the use of the information to use for that purpose;

examine the books, records, and files of the person;

conduct hearings and compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, and papers of any person;

make an investigation or hold an inquiry that is considered necessary to a disclosure of the facts as to

the amount of production from any oil or gas location, or of a company or other producer of oil or gas; and

the rendition of the oil and gas for taxing purposes;

require a producer, an explorer, or an operator of a lease or property to file reports and copies of records that the department considers necessary to forecast state revenue under this chapter; in the case of reports and copies of records relating to proposed, expected, or approved unit expenditures for a unit for which one or more working interest owners other than the operator have authority to approve unit expenditures, the required reports and copies of records are limited to those reports or copies of records that constitute or disclose communications between the operator and the working interest owners relating to unit budget matters;

require a producer that has an average total production in the state of more than 100,000 barrels a day for a calendar year to report the gross value at the point of production of the producer’s taxable oil and gas in the state for a calendar year and the total amount of lease expenditures in the state for that calendar year; and

assess against a person required under this section to file a report, statement, or other document a penalty, as determined by the department under standards adopted in regulation by the department, of not more than $1,000 for each day the person fails to file the report, statement, or other document after notice by the department; the penalty is in addition to any penalties under AS

43.05.220

and

43.05.290

and is assessed, collected, and paid in the same manner as a tax deficiency under this title; the penalty shall bear interest at the rate specified under AS

43.05.225

(1).

History.

(§ 5 ch 7 ESLA 1955; am § 16 ch 108 SLA 1996; am § 75 ch 163 SLA 2004; am § 21 ch 2 TSSLA 2006; am § 50 ch 1 SSSLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For gross value at the point of production of oil and gas, see 15 AAC 55, art. 1.

For tax credits, see 15 AAC 55, art. 3.

For payments and reporting, see 15 AAC 55, art. 5.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 1, SSSLA 2007 (HB 2001), presenting, among other matter, proposals to strengthen reporting requirements and impose additional penalties for failure to file reports when due, see 2007 House Journal 1547 — 1550.

Sec. 43.55.050.
Incorrect returns.

The department may determine whether or not a return required by this chapter to be filed with it is correct.
If a person makes an untrue or incorrect return of the gross production or the value of it, or fails or refuses to make a return, the department shall, under regulations adopted by it, determine the correct amount of gross production or the value of it, and compute the tax.

History.

(§ 6 ch 7 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 43.55.060.
Delinquency.

When the tax provided for in this chapter becomes delinquent, it bears interest as provided in AS

43.05.225

(1).
If any person fails to make a report required by this chapter, within the time prescribed by law for the report, the department shall examine the books, records and files of the person to determine the amount and value of the production to compute the tax, and the department shall add to the tax the cost of the examination, together with any penalties accrued.

History.

(§ 7 ch 7 ESLA 1955; am § 4 ch 58 SLA 1971; am § 13 ch 82 SLA 1982; am § 5 ch 23 SLA 1991)

Sec. 43.55.070.
Lien for tax. [Repealed, § 4 ch 94 SLA 1976.
For current law, see AS 43.10.035.]

Sec. 43.55.075.
Limitation on assessment and amended returns.

Except as provided in AS

43.05.260(c)

, the amount of a tax imposed by this chapter must be assessed within six years after the return was filed.

A decision of a regulatory agency, court, or other body with authority to resolve disputes that results in a retroactive change to a lease expenditure, to an adjustment to a lease expenditure, to costs of transportation, to sale price, to prevailing value, or to consideration of quality differentials relating to the commingling of oils has a corresponding effect, either an increase or decrease, as applicable, on the production tax value of oil or gas or the amount or availability of a tax credit as determined under this chapter. For purposes of this section, a change to a lease expenditure includes a change in the categorization of a lease expenditure as a qualified capital expenditure or as not a qualified capital expenditure. The producer shall

within 60 days after the change, notify the department in writing; and

within 120 days after the change, file amended returns covering all periods affected by the change, unless the department agrees otherwise or a stay is in place that affects the filing or payment, regardless of the pendency of appeals of the decision.

If an alteration in or modification of a producer’s federal income tax return or a recomputation of the producer’s federal income tax or determination of deficiency occurs that affects the amount of a tax imposed on the producer under this chapter, the producer shall

within 60 days after the final determination of the alteration, modification, recomputation, or deficiency, notify the department in writing; and

within 120 days after the final determination of the alteration, modification, recomputation, or deficiency, file amended returns covering all affected periods.

In this section,

“qualified capital expenditure” has the meaning given in AS

43.55.023

;

“return” includes a report, a statement, and an amended return, report, or statement.

History.

(§ 51 ch 1 SSSLA 2007)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 1, SSSLA 2007 (HB 2001), presenting, among other matter, a statement of the need to extend the statute of limitations for assessing deficiencies from three to six years, see 2007 House Journal 1547 — 1550.

Sec. 43.55.080.
Collection and deposit of revenue.

Except as otherwise provided under art. IX, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the department shall deposit in the general fund the money collected by it under AS

43.55.011

—

43.55.180

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 7 ESLA 1955; am § 14 ch 101 SLA 1972; am § 22 ch 2 TSSLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

A reference to “AS

43.55.011

—

43.55.150

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section in 1989 to reflect the enactment of AS

43.55.200

—

43.55.240

.

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 43.55.090.
Refunds.

In case of overpayment, duplicate payment or payment made in error, the department may refund the amount of the overpayment under AS

43.10.210

.

History.

(§ 11 ch 7 ESLA 1955; am § 28 ch 168 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1998, “AS

43.10.210

” was substituted for “AS 43.15.010” to reflect the 1990 renumbering of AS 43.15.010.

Sec. 43.55.100.
Acceptance of deductions. [Repealed, § 15 ch 101 SLA 1972.]